North Carolina, session 2025, HB358.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. TROPICAL STORM CHANTAL FUNDING AND OTHER DISASTER
RECOVERY
SUBPART I-A. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND SCOPE
SECTION 1A.1.(a) Legislative Findings. – The General Assembly finds that on July
6, 2025, Tropical Storm Chantal impacted the central region of North Carolina, resulting in
several days of severe weather, including flooding, high winds, and tornadoes, necessitating
recovery efforts in the impacted area of this State. On July 25, 2025, the United States Small
Business Administration issued a disaster declaration for several counties in the State. On August
5, 2025, the Governor declared a Type I disaster in the impacted area due to the effects of Tropical
Storm Chantal. On September 11, 2025, the President of the United States issued a major disaster
declaration in accordance with the Stafford Act (P.L. 93-288) for multiple counties in the State,
approving public assistance federal funding for affected counties.
SECTION 1A.1.(b) Applicability. – Except as otherwise provided, funds
appropriated in this Part apply only to the counties listed in this section.
SECTION 1A.1.(c) Scope. – Funds appropriated and allocated in this Part for
Tropical Storm Chantal shall only be expended to support disaster relief and recovery efforts in
the impacted area. For the purposes of this Part, the term "impacted area" means Alamance,
Caswell, Chatham, Durham, Granville, Moore, Orange, Person, and Wake Counties.
SUBPART I-B. TROPICAL STORM CHANTAL AND OTHER DISASTER RECOVERY
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 1B.1.(a) There is appropriated from the State Emergency Response and
Disaster Relief Fund the sum of sixty-five million five hundred thousand dollars ($65,500,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year as follows:
(1) Fifty-five million dollars ($55,000,000) to the Department of Public Safety,
Division of Emergency Management (NCEM), for the State Match Fund
(Budget Code 24552, Budget Fund 206628), established in Section 5.9(d) of
S.L. 2021-180, in the following amounts:
a. Forty million dollars ($40,000,000) for State matching requirements
for federal disaster assistance programs for eligible disasters,
excluding Hurricane Helene.
b. Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for State matching requirements
for federal disaster assistance programs for Tropical Storm Chantal.
(2) Six million dollars ($6,000,000) to NCEM for State emergency assistance in
the form of grants to individuals and families in accordance with
G.S. 166A-19.41(b)(1). NCEM shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative
*H358-v-5*

Emergency Management Oversight Committee on the expenditure of these
funds every six months beginning on the date this section becomes law until
funds are expended.
(3) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) to the Office of the State Auditor to provide
and maintain the public dashboard in accordance with Section 4.2(d) of S.L.
2025-2.
(4) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to the Office of State
Budget and Management to be allocated to Warren Wilson College to repair
damage from Hurricane Helene.
(5) One million dollars ($1,000,000) to the Board of Governors of The University
of North Carolina to disburse a grant to the University of North Carolina at
Asheville to repair, replace, renovate, or construct buildings or infrastructure
damaged by Hurricane Helene, and for resiliency and hazard mitigation on
campus property to prepare for future disasters.
SECTION 1B.1.(b) Of the funds appropriated to the Department of Transportation,
the sum of five million five hundred thousand dollars ($5,500,000) from the Transportation
Emergency Reserve shall be used to provide the nonfederal share for State highways damaged
by Tropical Storm Chantal.
SECTION 1B.2. Funds received on or after September 1, 2025, under the Stafford
Act (P.L. 93-288) and other federal disaster assistance programs for State disasters for federal
disaster assistance programs for Tropical Storm Chantal, are appropriated in the amounts
provided in the notifications of award from the federal government or any entity acting on behalf
of the federal government to administer federal disaster recovery funds. The Office of State
Budget and Management and affected State agencies shall report all notifications of award to the
Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the Fiscal Research Division of
the General Assembly within 30 days of notification. All notifications shall include, at a
minimum, the amount of the award and its duration and purpose.
SUBPART I-C. GOLDEN LEAF RAPID RECOVERY LOAN PROGRAM
MODIFICATION
SECTION 1C.1. Section 4.2 of S.L. 2020-4, as amended by Section 1.6 of S.L.
2020-97, Section 20.11 of S.L. 2022-6, Section 11.12 of S.L. 2022-74, Section 11.5A of S.L.
2023-134, and Section 10.6 of S.L. 2024-51, reads as rewritten:
"…
"SECTION 4.2.(b) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
…
(4) Net loan funds. – The total loan fund allocation authorized in subdivision (45)
of Section 3.3 of this act less (i) the amount used in accordance with
subdivision (a)(3a) of this section, (ii) the maximum amount allowed under
applicable federal law or guidance for the cost of administering the loans made
under the program, (iii) the State's loan funds that are not recaptured, and (iv)
expenses incurred to recapture loan funds, and (v) an amount equal to the
amount of non-State funds provided as matching funds pursuant to subsection
(c) of this section.funds.
…."
SUBPART I-D. REVERSION, LIMITATIONS ON USE OF FUNDS, AUDIT, AND
REPORTING OF FUNDS
SECTION 1D.1.(a) Reversion. – Funds appropriated under Subpart I-B of this Part
shall revert to the Savings Reserve if not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2031.
Page 2 Session Law 2025-92 House Bill 358

SECTION 1D.1.(b) Receipt of Allocations. – A recipient of State funds under this
Part shall use best efforts and take all reasonable steps to obtain alternative funds that cover the
losses or needs for which the State funds are provided, including funds from insurance policies
in effect and available federal aid. State funds paid under this Part are declared to be excess over
funds received by a recipient from the settlement of a claim for loss or damage covered under the
recipient's applicable insurance policy in effect or federal aid. Where a recipient is an institution
of higher education or a non-State entity, the requirement regarding alternative funds and the
calculation of alternative funds received under this subsection includes seeking private donations
to help cover the losses or needs for which State funds are provided. An agency awarding State
funds for disaster relief shall include a notice to the recipient of the requirements of this
subsection.
SECTION 1D.1.(c) Remittance of Funds. – If a recipient obtains alternative funds
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the recipient shall remit the funds to the State agency
from which the State funds were received. A recipient is not required to remit any amount in
excess of the State funds provided to the recipient under this Part. The State agency shall transfer
these funds to the Savings Reserve.
SECTION 1D.1.(d) Contract Requirements. – Any contract or other instrument
entered into by a recipient for receipt of funds under this Part shall include the requirements set
forth in subsections (b) and (c) of this section.
SECTION 1D.1.(e) Limitation on Powers of Governor. – The Governor may not use
the funds described in this Part to make budget adjustments under G.S. 143C-6-4 or to make
reallocations under G.S. 166A-19.40(c). Nothing in this Part shall be construed to prohibit the
Governor from exercising the Governor's authority under these statutes with respect to funds
other than those described in this Part.
SECTION 1D.1.(f) Directive. – The Governor shall ensure that funds allocated in
this Part are expended in a manner that does not adversely affect any person's or entity's eligibility
for federal funds that are made available, or that are anticipated to be made available, as a result
of natural disasters. The Governor shall also, to the extent practicable, avoid using State funds to
cover costs that will be, or likely will be, covered by federal funds.
SECTION 1D.1.(g) Continuation of Allocation Reporting Requirements. – The
Office of State Budget and Management shall add the appropriations and allocations provided
for in this Part to the reporting requirements set forth in Section 4.1(g) of S.L. 2025-2.
SECTION 1D.1.(h) Continuation of State Auditor Oversight. – The Office of the
Governor of North Carolina shall continue the reporting requirements set forth in Section 4.2 of
S.L. 2025-2 for the funds appropriated and allocated in this Part. The State Auditor shall include
all funds appropriated and allocated under this Part in their report to the Joint Legislative
Commission on Governmental Operations and include the expenditure of these funds in the
public dashboard as set forth in Section 4.2 of S.L. 2025-2.
SUBPART I-E. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 1E.1. This Part is effective when it becomes law.
PART II. EDUCATION
CARRYFORWARD FOR WILSON CC BIOLOGICS FUNDING
SECTION 2.1. Section 2A.5A of S.L. 2025-89 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2A.5A. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide funds to Wilson Community College to support the
operation of the biologics training center. Funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall not
revert at the end of the 2025-2026 fiscal year but shall remain available until June 30, 2027."
House Bill 358 Session Law 2025-92 Page 3

EDUCATION TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS
SECTION 2.2. G.S. 115C-366(a9), as amended by S.L. 2025-72, reads as rewritten:
"(a9) A student who is not a domiciliary of a local school administrative unit shall be
permitted to register to enroll in the public schools of that unit by remote means, including
electronic means, prior to commencement of the student's residency in the local school
administrative unit if all of the following apply:
…
(4) A parent or legal guardian submits proof of residency and documentation
related to the disciplinary actions pursuant to G.S. 115C-366(a4) upon the
child commencing attendance. If the proof of residency has not yet become
available because the parent or legal guardian and child are residing in
temporary housing, the local school administrative unit shall do the following:
a. Allow the child to enroll and begin attending school in that unit of
anticipated domicile (i) for a period of up to one year (i) from the
parent or legal guardian's reporting-for-duty date, separation date from
active military duty, or anticipated separation date from active military
duty or (ii) through the end of the school year before being considered
a resident of another local school administrative unit.
b. Allow a child who is a high school junior or senior to enroll and begin
attending school in that unit of anticipated domicile through high
school graduation.
A local school administrative unit shall make available to a student who registers to enroll
pursuant to this subsection the same opportunities available to a student enrolled
contemporaneously with domicilia, such as requesting or applying for school assignment,
registering for courses, and applying for any other programs that require additional request or
application. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to curtail a local school administrative
unit's authority pursuant to G.S. 115C-366(a5)."
SECTION 2.3.(a) G.S. 115D-39.5(a)(2), as enacted by S.L. 2025-56, reads as
rewritten:
"(2) Courses requested by the following entities that support the organizations'
training needs and are on a specialized course list approved by the State Board:
…
j. The Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians and the Catawba Indian Nation
law enforcement, fire, or EMS or rescue and lifesaving tribal
government departments or programs.
…."
SECTION 2.3.(b) Section 5 of S.L. 2025-57 is repealed.
SECTION 2.4.(a) G.S. 116-143(d1), as amended by S.L. 2025-17, reads as
rewritten:
"(d1) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, the Board of Governors of The
University of North Carolina may do any of the following:
(1) Personnel. – Provide regulations under which personnel may enroll in The
University of North Carolina free of charge for tuition and fees during the
period of normal employment if the (i) enrollment does not interfere with
normal employment obligations and (ii) enrollments are not counted for the
purpose of receiving General Fund appropriations. Personnel may enroll free
of charge for tuition and fees as follows:
a. A full-time faculty member of the rank of full-time instructor or above
of The University of North Carolina may shall not enroll in not more
than three courses per year.
Page 4 Session Law 2025-92 House Bill 358

b. A full-time staff member of The University of North Carolina may
shall not enroll in more than three courses per year.
c. A full-time or part-time campus law enforcement officer may enroll in
the number of courses per year determined by regulation.
…."
SECTION 2.4.(b) This section is effective June 26, 2025, and applies beginning
with the 2025-2026 academic year.
SECTION 2.5. Part 4 of S.L. 2025-46 is repealed.
SECTION 2.6. Part 3 of S.L. 2025-56 is repealed.
SECTION 2.7. Except as otherwise provided, Sections 2.2 through 2.7 of this act
are effective when they become law.
CLARIFICATION OF REDUCTIONS FOR VIRTUAL CIHS AND SMALL SPECIALTY
SCHOOL FUNDING
SECTION 2.8.(a) Section 2A.6(b) of S.L. 2025-89 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2A.6.(b) The funds appropriated to the Department of Public Instruction are
reduced for the 2025-2026 fiscal year by the sum of nine million one hundred twenty-two
thousand one hundred eighty-four dollars ($9,122,184) and for the 2026-2027 fiscal year by the
sum of nine million one hundred twenty-two thousand one hundred eighty-four dollars
($9,122,184), as follows:
(1) Reduced-Price Meal Copays (Budget Code 13510, Budget Fund 101180). –
For each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, three million dollars
($3,000,000) in recurring funds to offset copays for reduced-price school
meals to match actual expenditures.
(2) Small Specialty High Schools (Budget Code 13510, Budget Fund 101180). –
For each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, one million eight hundred
seventeen thousand nine hundred sixty-eight dollars ($1,817,968) in recurring
funds to eliminate funds for small specialty high schools, an initiative that
previously supported a school-within-a-school model. Any small specialty
high school authorized to operate pursuant to Section 7.52(a) of S.L. 2005-276
that received funding for that purpose during the 2024-2025 fiscal year shall
continue to receive funding for a single additional principal and clerical
position hired pursuant to that section.
(3) Learn and Earn (Budget Code 13510, Budget Fund 101180). – For each year
of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, one million dollars ($1,000,000) in
recurring funds to eliminate funds for virtual cooperative innovative high
schools, which existed under a previous version of the State's dual enrollment
program but are now part of the Career and College Promise program. Any
cooperative innovative high school originally approved as a virtual
cooperative innovative high school shall continue to receive funding pursuant
to Section 7.22(c)(1) of S.L. 2017-57.
…."
SECTION 2.8.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.
AUTHORIZE NEW COOPERATIVE INNOVATIVE HIGH SCHOOLS AND CODIFY
SUPPLEMENTAL FUNDING
SECTION 2.9.(a) Of the funds appropriated to the Department of Public Instruction
by this act for cooperative innovative high schools, the Department shall allocate to local school
administrative units the sum of six hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($635,000) in recurring
funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium in amounts consistent with those set forth
House Bill 358 Session Law 2025-92 Page 5

in G.S. 115C-238.54A, as enacted by this section, as supplemental funding for the following
cooperative innovative high schools for the 2025-2026 school year:
(1) Hawthorne Academy of Health Sciences.
(2) Martin Innovative Early College of Health Sciences.
(3) Moore Innovative High School.
SECTION 2.9.(b) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and for subsequent
school years thereafter, notwithstanding G.S. 115C-238.51A(c), G.S. 115C-238.54, and any
other provision of law to the contrary, Hawthorne Academy of Health Sciences, Martin
Innovative Early College of Health Sciences, and Moore Innovative High School shall be
permitted to operate in accordance with G.S. 115C-238.53 and G.S. 115C-238.54 as cooperative
innovative high schools approved under G.S. 115C-238.51A(c) and shall be subject to the
evaluation requirements of G.S. 115C-238.55.
SECTION 2.9.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of one million one hundred ten thousand dollars ($1,110,000) in
recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide supplemental funding
in accordance with G.S. 115C-238.54A, as enacted by this act, to (i) Dare Early College High
School, (ii) Rockingham County CTE Innovation High School, and (iii) each school named in
subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 2.9.(d) Part 9 of Article 16 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-238.54A. Cooperative innovative high schools – supplemental allotment funding
based on county development tier designation.
(a) Allocation of Funding. – The Department shall allocate cooperative innovative high
school supplemental allotment funds to local school administrative units with a cooperative
innovative high school approved pursuant to G.S. 115C-238.51A(c) based on developmental tier
area, as defined in G.S. 143B-437.08, as follows:
(1) Local school administrative units located in a development tier one area shall
be allocated funding as follows:
a. The sum of two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($275,000) in
recurring funds for each cooperative innovative high school in the unit.
b. For the Northeast Regional School of Biotechnology and Agriscience,
the Department shall allocate the sum of three hundred ten thousand
dollars ($310,000) in recurring funds from the regional school
supplemental allotment for the school for each fiscal year.
(2) Local school administrative units located in a development tier two area shall
be allocated the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in recurring
funds for each cooperative innovative high school in the unit.
(3) Local school administrative units located in a development tier three area shall
be allocated the sum of one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) in
recurring funds for each cooperative innovative high school in the unit.
(b) Applicability of Funds. – The allotment of funds to local school administrative units
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall include cooperative innovative high schools
approved pursuant to G.S. 115C-238.51A(c) operated by a local school administrative unit
regardless of not receiving allotments in a prior fiscal year. Funds shall not be allocated to local
school administrative units for cooperative innovative high schools approved by the State Board
pursuant to G.S. 115C-238.51A(b)."
TUITION GRANT SCALE-UP FUNDS FOR THE NORTH CAROLINA SCHOOL OF
SCIENCE AND MATHEMATICS AND THE UNIVERSITY OF NORTH
CAROLINA SCHOOL OF THE ARTS
Page 6 Session Law 2025-92 House Bill 358

SECTION 2.10. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium
the sum of two million eight hundred thousand dollars ($2,800,000) in recurring funds to support
tuition grants for increased eligible high school graduates of the North Carolina School of Science
and Mathematics and the University of North Carolina School of the Arts under Part 6 of Article
23 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes.
REVISE HIGHER EDUCATION ACCREDITATION REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 2.11.(a) G.S. 116-11.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-11.4. Accreditation.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Accreditation cycle. – The period of time during which a constituent
institution of The University of North Carolina is accredited.
(2) Accrediting agency. – An agency or association that accredits institutions of
higher education.
(2a) Institutional accrediting agency. – An accrediting agency that is recognized as
an institutional accrediting agency by the United States Department of
Education pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1099b.
(3) Regional Preferred accrediting agency. – One of the following accrediting
agencies:An accrediting agency that meets all of the following criteria:
a. Is an institutional accrediting agency.
b. Is one of the following accrediting agencies:
1. Commission for Public Higher Education.
a.2. Higher Learning Commission.
b.3. Middle States Commission on Higher Education.
c.4. New England Commission on Higher Education.
d.5. Northwest Commission on Colleges and Universities.
e.6. Southern Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on
Colleges.
f.7. Western Association of Schools and Colleges Senior College
and University Commission.
(b) Prohibit Consecutive Accreditation by an Accrediting Agency. – A constituent
institution of The University of North Carolina shall not receive accreditation by an accrediting
agency for consecutive accreditation cycles except as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
(b1) Approved Accreditation Required. – A postsecondary constituent institution of The
University of North Carolina shall maintain accreditation from a preferred accrediting agency. A
postsecondary constituent institution of The University of North Carolina may also receive
accreditation from an accrediting agency that is not a preferred accrediting agency as long as the
postsecondary constituent institution continues to maintain its accreditation from a preferred
accrediting agency.
(c) Accreditation Transfer Procedure. – A constituent institution that pursues
accreditation with a different accrediting agency in accordance with this section shall pursue
accreditation with a regionalaccrediting agency. If the constituent institution is not granted
candidacy status by any regional accrediting agency that is different from its current accrediting
agency at least three years prior to the expiration of its current accreditation, the constituent
institution may remain with its current accrediting agency for an additional accreditation cycle.
…."
SECTION 2.11.(b) G.S. 115D-21.2, as enacted by subsection (c) of Section 1 of
S.L. 2025-56, reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-21.2. Accreditation.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
House Bill 358 Session Law 2025-92 Page 7

(1) Accreditation cycle. – The period of time during which a community college
is accredited.
(2) Accrediting agency. – An agency or association that accredits institutions of
higher education.
(2a) Institutional accrediting agency. – An accrediting agency that is recognized as
an institutional accrediting agency by the United States Department of
Education pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1099b.
(3) Regional Preferred accrediting agency. – One of the following accrediting
agencies:An accrediting agency that meets all of the following criteria:
a. Is an institutional accrediting agency.
b. Is one of the following accrediting agencies:
1. Commission for Public Higher Education.
a.2. Higher Learning Commission.
b.3. Middle States Commission on Higher Education.
c.4. New England Commission on Higher Education.
d.5. Northwest Commission on Colleges and Universities.
e.6. Southern Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on
Colleges.
f.7. Western Association of Schools and Colleges Accrediting
Commission for Community and Junior Colleges.
(b) Prohibit Consecutive Accreditation by an Accrediting Agency. – A community
college shall not receive accreditation by an accrediting agency for consecutive accreditation
cycles except as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
(b1) Approved Accreditation Required. – A community college shall maintain
accreditation from a preferred accrediting agency. A community college may also receive
accreditation from an accrediting agency that is not a preferred accrediting agency as long as the
community college continues to maintain its accreditation from a preferred accrediting agency.
(c) Accreditation Transfer Procedure. – A community college that pursues accreditation
with a different accrediting agency in accordance with this section shall pursue accreditation with
a regionalaccrediting agency. If the community college is not granted candidacy status by any
regional accrediting agency that is different from its current accrediting agency at least three
years prior to the expiration of its current accreditation,the community college may remain with
its current accrediting agency for an additional accreditation cycle.
…."
SECTION 2.11.(c) G.S. 90-354(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-354. Appointments and removal of Board members, terms and compensation.
(a) The members of the Board shall be appointed as follows:
(1) The Governor shall appoint the following members:
a. One licensed dietitian/nutritionist as described in G.S. 90-353(a1)(1),
who shall be an educator on the faculty of a college or university
accredited at the time from the appropriate regional institutional
accrediting agency recognized by the Council on Higher Education
Accreditation and the United States Department of Education,
specializing in the field of dietetics or nutrition.
b. The licensed physician as described in G.S. 90-353(a1)(3).
c. The public member as described in G.S. 90-353(a1)(4).
(2) The General Assembly upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House
of Representatives shall appoint one licensed dietitian/nutritionist as described
in G.S. 90-353(a1)(1) and one licensed nutritionist as described in
G.S. 90-353(a1)(2), both in accordance with G.S. 120-121. One of these
appointees shall be a dietician/nutritionist or a nutritionist whose primary
Page 8 Session Law 2025-92 House Bill 358

practice is clinical dietetics or nutrition in a hospital or long-term care
institution regulated under Article 5 or Part 1 of Article 6 of Chapter 131E of
the General Statutes.
(3) The General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate shall appoint one licensed dietitian/nutritionist as
described in G.S. 90-353(a1)(1) and one licensed nutritionist as described in
G.S. 90-353(a1)(2), both in accordance with G.S. 120-121. One of these
appointees shall be a dietician/nutritionist or a nutritionist whose primary
practice is consulting in, or the private practice of, dietetics or nutrition."
SECTION 2.11.(d) G.S. 90-357.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-357.5. License requirements.
(a) Each applicant for a license as a licensed dietitian/nutritionist shall submit a
completed application as required by the Board, submit any fees as required by the Board, and
meet one of the following criteria:
(1) The applicant shall submit proof of completion for the following educational,
supervised practice experience and examination requirements:
a. The applicant has received a baccalaureate degree, master's, or
doctoral degree or validated foreign equivalent with a major in human
nutrition, foods and nutrition, dietetics, food systems management,
community nutrition, public health nutrition, nutrition education,
nutrition, nutrition science, clinical nutrition, applied clinical nutrition,
nutrition counseling, nutrition and functional medicine, nutritional
biochemistry, nutrition and integrative health, or an equivalent course
of study, from a college or university accredited at the time of
graduation from the appropriate regional institutional accrediting
agency recognized by the Council on Higher Education Accreditation
and the United States Department of Education and that, as approved
by the Board, meets the competency requirements of an ACEND
accredited didactic program in dietetics that shall, at a minimum,
include the following courses:
…
(c) Each applicant for a license as a licensed nutritionist shall submit a completed
application as required by the Board, submit any fees as required by the Board, and shall submit
proof of the completion of all of the following educational, supervised practice experience, and
examination requirements:
(1) The applicant has received any of the following from a college or university
accredited at the time of graduation from the appropriate regional institutional
accrediting agency recognized by the Council on Higher Education or a
validated foreign equivalent: a master's or doctoral nutrition degree with a
major in human nutrition, foods and nutrition, dietetics, community nutrition,
public health nutrition, nutrition education, nutrition, nutrition science,
clinical nutrition, applied clinical nutrition, nutrition counseling, nutrition and
functional medicine, nutritional biochemistry, nutrition and integrative health,
or an equivalent course of study or a master's or doctoral degree in a field of
clinical health care. Regardless of the course of study, an applicant shall have
completed coursework from a regionally accredited college or university in
medical nutrition therapy that shall consist of the following courses:
…."
SECTION 2.11.(e) G.S. 90-359 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-359. Examinations.
House Bill 358 Session Law 2025-92 Page 9

Competency examinations shall be administered at least twice each year to qualified
applicants for licensing. The examinations may be administered by a national testing service. The
examinations shall include the RDN Examination given by the Commission on Dietetic
Registration, the CNS Examination given by the Board for Certification of Nutrition Specialists
and the DACBN Examination given by the American Clinical Board of Nutrition. The Board
may include other nutrition therapy-focused examinations accredited by the National
Commission for Certifying Agencies for graduates with a baccalaureate degree or higher from a
college or university accredited at the time from the appropriate regional institutional accrediting
agency recognized by the Council on Health Education Accreditation and the United States
Department of Education that are approved by two-thirds vote of the entire Board."
SECTION 2.11.(f) G.S. 90-631(b), as amended by subsection (c) of Section 2 of
S.L. 2025-56, reads as rewritten:
"(b) A massage and bodywork therapy program operated by a North Carolina community
college that is accredited by a regional preferred accrediting agency, as defined in
G.S. 115D-21.2, is exempt from the approval process, licensure process, or both, established by
the Board. The college shall certify annually to the Board that the program meets or exceeds the
minimum standards for curriculum, faculty, and learning resources established by the Board.
Students who complete the program shall qualify for licenses from the Board as if the program
were approved, licensed, or both, by the Board."
SECTION 2.11.(g) G.S. 93A-4(a2), as amended by subsection (d) of Section 2 of
S.L. 2025-56, reads as rewritten:
"(a2) A certified real estate education provider shall pay a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) per
licensee to the Commission for each licensee completing a postlicensing education course
conducted by the school, provided that these fees shall not be charged to a community college,
junior college, college, or university located in this State and accredited by a regional preferred
accrediting agency, as defined in G.S. 115D-21.2 and G.S. 116-11.4, respectively."
SECTION 2.11.(h) G.S. 93A-38.5(e), as amended by subsection (e) of Section 2 of
S.L. 2025-56, reads as rewritten:
"(e) The Commission may establish a nonrefundable course application fee to be charged
to private real estate education providers for the review and approval of a proposed continuing
education course. The fee shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00) per course.
The Commission may charge the private real estate education providers of an approved course a
nonrefundable fee not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for the annual renewal of course
approval.
A private real estate education provider shall pay a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) per licensee to
the Commission for each licensee completing an approved continuing education course
conducted by the sponsor.
The Commission shall not charge a course application fee, a course renewal fee, or any other
fee for a continuing education course sponsored by a community college, junior college, college,
or university located in this State and accredited by a regional preferred accrediting agency, as
defined in G.S. 115D-21.2 and G.S. 116-11.4, respectively."
SECTION 2.11.(i) G.S. 93E-1-7(b2), as amended by subsection (f) of Section 2 of
S.L. 2025-56, reads as rewritten:
"(b2) The Board shall not charge a course application fee, a course renewal fee, or any other
fee for a continuing education course offered by a North Carolina college, university, junior
college, or community or technical college accredited by a regional preferred accrediting agency,
as defined in G.S. 115D-21.2 and G.S. 116-11.4, respectively, or an agency of the federal, State,
or local government."
SECTION 2.11.(j) G.S. 93E-1-8, as amended by subsection (g) of Section 2 of S.L.
2025-56, reads as rewritten:
"§ 93E-1-8. Education program approval and fees.
Page 10 Session Law 2025-92 House Bill 358

…
(b) The Board may by rule set nonrefundable fees chargeable to private real estate
appraisal schools or course sponsors, including appraisal trade organizations, for the approval
and annual renewal of approval of their qualifying courses required by G.S. 93E-1-6(a), or
equivalent courses. The fees shall be one hundred dollars ($100.00) per course for approval and
fifty dollars ($50.00) per course for renewal of approval. No fees shall be charged for the approval
or renewal of approval to conduct appraiser qualifying courses where such courses are offered
by a North Carolina college, university, junior college, or community or technical college
accredited by a regional preferred accrediting agency, as defined in G.S. 115D-21.2 and
G.S. 116-11.4, respectively, or an agency of the federal, State, or local government.
…
(d) Nonrefundable fees of one hundred dollars ($100.00) per course may be charged to
schools and course sponsors for the approval to conduct appraiser continuing education courses
and fifty dollars ($50.00) per course for renewal of approval. However, no fees shall be charged
for the approval or renewal of approval to conduct appraiser continuing education courses where
such courses are offered by a North Carolina college, university, junior college, or community
or technical college accredited by a regional preferred accrediting agency, as defined in
G.S. 115D-21.2 and G.S. 116-11.4, respectively, or by an agency of the federal, State, or local
government. A nonrefundable fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) per course may be charged to current
or former licensees or certificate holders requesting approval by the Board of a course for
continuing education credit when approval of such course has not been previously obtained by
the offering school or course sponsor."
SECTION 2.11.(k) G.S. 115C-238.85 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-238.85. Other virtual education providers.
Local school administrative units may partner with eligible providers other than NCVPS for
e-learning opportunities. Eligible providers shall meet all of the following:
(1) Be accredited by a regional accrediting agency such as, but not limited to,
AdvancEd or the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools (SACS).an
accrediting agency, such as Cognia or an institutional accrediting agency.
(2) Employ teachers who hold teaching licenses from states that participate in the
NASDTEC Educator Identification Clearinghouse.
(3) Ensure that courses offered to North Carolina students are aligned to the North
Carolina Standard Course of Study."
SECTION 2.11.(l) G.S. 115C-555 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-555. Qualification of nonpublic schools.
The provisions of this Part shall apply to any nonpublic school which has one or more of the
following characteristics:
(1) It is accredited by the State Board of Education.
(2) It is accredited by a national or regional an institutional accrediting agency.
(3) It is an active member of the North Carolina Association of Independent
Schools.
(4) It receives no funding from the State of North Carolina. For the purposes of
this Article, scholarship funds awarded pursuant to Part 2A of this Article or
Article 41 of this Chapter to eligible students attending a nonpublic school
shall not be considered funding from the State of North Carolina."
SECTION 2.11.(m) G.S. 116-201(b), as amended by subsection (o) of Section 2 of
S.L. 2025-56, reads as rewritten:
"(b) As used in this Article, the following terms shall have the following meanings unless
the context indicates a contrary intent:
(1) "Article" or "this Article" means Article. – Article 23 of Chapter 116 of the
General Statutes of North Carolina;Carolina.
House Bill 358 Session Law 2025-92 Page 11

(2) "Authority" means the Authority. – The State Education Assistance Authority
created by this Article or, if the Authority is abolished, the board, body,
commission or agency succeeding to its principal functions, or on whom the
powers given by this Article to the Authority shall be conferred by law;law.
(3) "Bond resolution" or "resolution" when Bond resolution or resolution. – When
used in relation to the issuance of bonds is deemed to mean bonds, either any
resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or any trust agreement or other
instrument securing any bonds;bonds.
(4) "Bonds" or "revenue bonds" means the Bonds or revenue bonds. – The
obligations authorized to be issued by the Authority under this Article, which
may consist of revenue bonds, revenue refunding bonds, bond anticipation
notes and other notes and obligations, evidencing the Authority's obligation to
repay borrowed money from revenues, funds and other money pledged or
made available therefor by the Authority under this Article;Article.
(5) "Eligible institution," with Eligible institution. – With respect to student loans,
has the same meaning as the term has as is defined in section 1085 of Title 20
of the United States Code;Code.
(6) "Eligible institution," with Eligible institution. – With respect to grants and
work-study programs, includes the constituent institutions of The University
of North Carolina, all state-supported State-supported institutions organized
and administered pursuant to Chapter 115A of the General Statutes Statutes,
and all private institutions as defined in subdivision (8) of this
subsection;subsection.
(7) "Student obligations" means student Student obligations. – Student loan notes
and other debt obligations evidencing loans to students which the Authority
may make, take, acquire, buy, sell, endorse or guarantee under the provisions
of this Article, and Article. This term may include any direct or indirect
interest in the whole or any part of any such notes or obligations;obligations.
(8) "Private institution" means an Private institution. – An institution other than
that meets all of the following requirements:
a. Is not a seminary, Bible school, Bible college college, or similar
religious institution in this State that is State.
b. Is not owned or operated by the State or any agency or political
subdivision thereof, or by any combination thereof, that offers thereof.
c. Offers post-high school education and is education.
d. Is accredited by a regional one of the following:
1. A preferred accrediting agency, as defined in G.S. 115D-21.2
and G.S. 116-11.4, or the G.S. 116-11.4.
2. The Transnational Association of Christian Colleges and
Schools, or, in the case of institutions that are not eligible to be
considered for accreditation, accredited in those categories and
by those nationally recognized accrediting agencies that the
Authority may designate;Schools.
3. In the case of institutions that are not eligible to be considered
for accreditation, a nationally recognized accrediting agency
that is designated by the Authority.
(9) "Reserve Trust Fund" means the Reserve Trust Fund. – The trust fund
authorized under G.S. 116-209 of this Article;Article.
(10) "State Education Assistance Authority Loan Fund" means the State Education
Assistance Authority Loan Fund. – The trust fund so designated and
authorized by G.S. 116-209.3 of this Article;Article.
Page 12 Session Law 2025-92 House Bill 358

(11) "Student," with Student. – With respect to scholarships, grants, and
work-study programs, means a person who meets all of the following
requirements:
a. Is a resident of the State for tuition purposes under the criteria set forth
in G.S. 116-143.1 and in accordance with any definitions of residency
that may from time to time be prescribed by the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina, who, under Carolina.
b. Under regulations adopted by the Authority, has enrolled or will enroll
in an eligible institution for the purpose of pursuing his education
beyond the high school level, who is level.
c. Is making suitable progress in his education in accordance with
standards acceptable to the Authority and, for Authority.
d. For the purposes of G.S. 116-209.19, who has not received a
bachelor's degree, or qualified for it and who is it.
e. Is otherwise classified as an undergraduate under those regulations
that the Authority may promulgate;promulgate.
(12) "Student," with Student. – With respect to loans, means a person who meets
all of the following requirements:
a. Is a resident of the State as defined in subdivision (11) of this
subsection and subsection.
b. Is an eligible student as defined in 20 U.S.C. 1071 who is 20 U.S.C.
1071.
c. Is enrolled in an eligible institution located in North Carolina;
andCarolina.
(13) "Student loans" means loans Student loans. – Loans to students students, as
defined in subdivisions (11) and (12) of this subsection subsection, to aid them
in pursuing their education beyond the high school level."
SECTION 2.11.(n) G.S. 116-280(3), as amended by subsection (p) of Section 2 of
S.L. 2025-56, reads as rewritten:
"(3) Eligible private postsecondary institution. – A school that is any of the
following:
a. A nonprofit postsecondary educational institution with a main
permanent campus located in this State that is not owned or operated
by the State of North Carolina or by an agency or political subdivision
of the State or by any combination thereof that satisfies all of the
following:
1. Is either (i) accredited by a regional preferred accrediting
agency, as defined in G.S. 115D-21.2 and G.S. 116-11.4, or the
Transnational Association of Christian Colleges and Schools
or (ii) was accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges
and Schools Commission on Colleges on January 1, 2021, and,
beginning January 1, 2021, was a member of the Transnational
Association of Christian Colleges and Schools.
2. Awards a postsecondary degree as defined in G.S. 116-15.
b. A postsecondary institution owned or operated by a hospital authority
as defined in G.S. 131E-16(14) or school of nursing affiliated with a
nonprofit postsecondary educational institution as defined in
sub-subdivision a. of this subsection."
SECTION 2.11.(o) G.S. 130A-309.28 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-309.28. University research.
House Bill 358 Session Law 2025-92 Page 13

Research, training, and service activities related to solid and hazardous waste management
conducted by The University of North Carolina shall be coordinated by the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina through the Office of the President. Proposals for research
contracts and grants; public service assignments; and responses to requests for information and
technical assistance by the State and units of local government, business, and industry shall be
addressed by a formal process involving an advisory board of university personnel appointed by
the President and chaired and directed by an individual appointed by the President. The Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina shall consult with the Department in developing
the research programs and provide the Department with a copy of the proposed research program
for review and comment before the research is undertaken. Research contracts shall be awarded
to independent nonprofit colleges and universities within the State which are accredited by a
regional preferred accrediting agency, as defined in G.S. 116-11.4, on the same basis as those
research contracts awarded to The University of North Carolina. Research activities shall include
the following areas:
(1) Methods and processes for recycling solid and hazardous waste.
(2) Methods of treatment for detoxifying hazardous waste.
(3) Technologies for disposing of solid and hazardous waste."
SECTION 2.11.(p) This section is effective when it becomes law.
BRUNSWICK COMMUNITY COLLEGE CARRYFORWARD EXTENSION
SECTION 2.12. Notwithstanding Section 5.3 of S.L. 2023-134 or any other
provision of law to the contrary, the twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds appropriated pursuant to S.L. 2023-134 as a directed grant to Brunswick Community
College for the 2023-2024 fiscal year for its workforce development center and public safety
center capital projects shall not revert as provided in subsection (b) of Section 5.3 of S.L.
2023-134 but shall instead remain available until December 31, 2028.
ADMINISTRATIVE FUNDS FOR RESIDENTIAL SCHOOLS
SECTION 2.13.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Governor
Morehead School for the Blind the sum of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) in recurring
funds in each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for costs associated with the school
functioning as an independent agency.
SECTION 2.13.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Eastern
North Carolina School for the Deaf the sum of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) in
recurring funds in each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for costs associated with the school
functioning as an independent agency.
SECTION 2.13.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North
Carolina School for the Deaf the sum of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) in recurring
funds in each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for costs associated with the school
functioning as an independent agency.
SECTION 2.13.(d) To ensure compliance with State agency requirements, funds
appropriated by this section may be used for additional positions, reclassification of existing
positions, or administrative, legal, technology, or operational expenses.
PART III. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES [RESERVED]
PART IV. AGRICULTURE AND NATURAL AND ECONOMIC RESOURCES
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR MODIFICATIONS
SECTION 4.1.(a) G.S. 95-13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-13. Enforcement of rules and regulations.
Page 14 Session Law 2025-92 House Bill 358

In the event any person, firm or corporation shall, after notice by the Commissioner of Labor,
violate any of the rules or regulations promulgated under the authority of this Article or any laws
amendatory hereof relating to safety devices, or measures, the Department of Labor may take
appropriate action in the civil courts of the State to enforce the rules and regulations. The
Attorney General of the State, upon the request of the Commissioner of Labor, may take
appropriate action in the civil courts of the State to enforce such the rules and regulations. Upon
request of the Attorney General, any district attorney of the State of North Carolina in whose
district such the rule or regulation is violated may perform the duties hereinabove required of the
Attorney General."
SECTION 4.1.(b) G.S. 95-25.18 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-25.18. Legal representation.
It The Department of Labor may represent itself in any action or proceeding in connection
with this Article. Upon request of the Department of Labor, it shall be the duty of the Attorney
General of North Carolina, when requested, Carolina to represent the Department of Labor in
actions or proceedings in connection with this Article. The Attorney General may designate staff
to fulfill the duty under this section."
SECTION 4.1.(c) G.S. 95-47.9 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-47.9. Enforcement of Article; rules; hearing; penalty; criminal penalties.
…
(e) Any person who operates as a private personnel service without first obtaining the
appropriate license (i) shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor; and (ii) be subject to a civil
penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) for
each day the private personnel service operates without a license, the penalty not to exceed a total
of two thousand dollars ($2,000). Actions to recover civil penalties shall be initiated by the
Attorney General. Department of Labor. Upon the request of the Department of Labor, it shall
be the duty of the Attorney General to initiate actions to recover civil penalties at the discretion
of the Commissioner. The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this section shall be
remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2."
SECTION 4.1.(d) G.S. 95-110.12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-110.12. Legal representation.
It The Department of Labor may represent itself in any action or proceeding in connection
with this Article. Upon request of the Department of Labor, it shall be the duty of the Attorney
General of North Carolina, when requested, Carolina to represent the Department of Labor in
actions or proceedings in connection with this Article or the rules and regulations promulgated
thereunder.Article. The Attorney General may designate staff to fulfill the duty under this
section."
SECTION 4.1.(e) G.S. 95-111.15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-111.15. Legal representation.
It The Department of Labor may represent itself in any action or proceeding in connection
with this Article or any rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. Upon the request of the
Department of Labor, it shall be the duty of the Attorney General of North Carolina, when
requested, to represent the Department of Labor in actions or proceedings in connection with this
Article or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.Article. The Attorney General may
designate staff to fulfill the duty under this section."
SECTION 4.1.(f) G.S. 95-142 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-142. Legal representation of the Department of Labor.
It The Department may represent itself in all actions and proceedings in connection with this
Article. Upon request of the Department, it shall be the duty of the Attorney General to represent
the Department of Labor or designate some member of his staff to represent them in all actions
or proceedings in connection with this Article. The Attorney General may designate staff to fulfill
the duty under this section."
House Bill 358 Session Law 2025-92 Page 15

SECTION 4.1.(g) G.S. 95-4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-4. Authority, powers and duties of Commissioner.
The Commissioner of Labor shall be the executive and administrative head of the Department
of Labor. In addition to the other powers and duties conferred upon the Commissioner of Labor
by this Article, the said Commissioner shall have authority and be charged with the duty:
…
(7) Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-6-9 and G.S. 114-2.3, to retain, designate,
employ, expend available funds for, and otherwise engage private counsel to
provide litigation services and represent the Department in any matter the
Commissioner deems necessary to represent the interests of the Department
and any of its component units, bureaus, officers, or employees. For the
purposes of this subdivision, the terms "private counsel" and "litigation
services" are as defined in G.S. 147-17."
SECTION 4.1.(h) This section is effective when it becomes law.
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR FUNDING
SECTION 4.2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Labor the sum of six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($650,000) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($650,000) in recurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for three full-time equivalent attorney positions. These
positions shall be designated as exempt policy-making positions of the Commissioner of Labor,
not subject to the limitations under G.S. 126-5(d)(2).
SECTION 4.2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Labor the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in recurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for security services for the Department of Labor.
FACILITY AUTHORITY PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS FUNDING
SECTION 4.3. There is appropriated from the Stabilization and Inflation Reserve
established in Section 2.2(q) of S.L. 2022-74 to the Office of State Budget and Management
(OSBM) the sum of thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated, within 60 days from the date this act becomes effective, to
the Centennial Authority (Authority). The Authority shall disburse the funds allocated to a
qualifying entity for costs incurred for public infrastructure improvements on, adjacent to, or
supporting a regional entertainment and sports arena owned by the Authority. Funds appropriated
in this section do not revert but remain available to the Authority until completion of the
improvements. For purposes of this section, (i) the Authority is the facility authority created by
the General Assembly under Part 4 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes and (ii)
a qualifying entity is either of the following:
(1) The entity with which the Authority has contracted for the redevelopment of
the land surrounding the regional entertainment and sports arena benefitted by
the appropriation authorized by this section.
(2) The entity's assignee.
HERTFORD COUNTY ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT FUNDS
SECTION 4.4.(a) Appropriation. – Provided the Department of Commerce
(Department) enters into an agreement in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, there is
appropriated from the Stabilization and Inflation Reserve established in Section 2.2(q) of S.L.
2022-74 to the Department the sum of fifty-one million dollars ($51,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used as follows: (i) forty million dollars ($40,000,000)
for reimbursement for costs incurred in permitting, engineering, designing, and constructing a
Page 16 Session Law 2025-92 House Bill 358

publicly owned dock at a project site and (ii) eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) for
constructing a public road leading to the publicly owned dock and capable of accommodating
industrial loads.
Funds appropriated by this section do not revert but remain available for these
purposes. Payments authorized under this subsection may be made to a county, a rural
development authority, or as reimbursements to an eligible business, as specified in the
agreement or agreements required under subsection (b) of this section. Appropriations for public
roads authorized under this subsection may be transferred to the Department of Transportation,
as deemed necessary or beneficial by the Department. For purposes of this section, an "eligible
business" is a manufacturer of steel forgings and large diameter steel fabrications, and a "project
site" is an industrial manufacturing site in Hertford County with direct access to the Chowan
River.
SECTION 4.4.(b) Agreement. – Prior to the allocation of any funds appropriated by
this section, the Department shall enter into an agreement or agreements with Hertford County
(County), the Hertford County Rural Development Authority (Authority), or both, and an eligible
business. Agreements entered into under this subsection are binding and constitute a continuing
contractual obligation of each party to the agreements. The agreement or agreements shall
include, at a minimum, the following provisions:
(1) A provision requiring the eligible business to (i) invest at least nine hundred
seventy-four million dollars ($974,000,000) of private funds in the project site
and (ii) create and maintain at least 835 new jobs having an overall average
compensation that exceeds one hundred seventy-five percent (175%) of the
average wage for all insured private employers in the county in which the
project site is located. For purposes of this subdivision, "new job" shall have
the same meaning as "eligible position" under G.S. 143B-437.51,
notwithstanding the base period applicable to that section. The Department
shall determine the relevant periods during which the eligible business must
meet the requirements of this subdivision.
(2) One or more provisions addressing all the performance criteria, remedies, and
other safeguards required by the Department to secure the State's benefit
derived from (i) the permitting, engineering, design, and construction of a
publicly owned dock at the project site and (ii) the construction of a public
road at the project site, including a provision ensuring that the benefits to the
State from such activity outweigh the costs.
(3) A provision requiring the eligible business to repay an appropriate,
proportionate amount for any failure by the business to meet and maintain the
applicable performance criteria on which State funds appropriated by this
section were based.
(4) A provision prohibiting the eligible business from seeking or accepting any
grant pursuant to Part 2G or Part 2H of Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the
General Statutes for any jobs created because of appropriations made under
this section.
(5) A provision requiring that State funds appropriated by this section be allocated
only for expenses incurred for (i) permitting, engineering, and design of, or
construction of, a publicly owned dock at the project site or (ii) the
construction of a public road at the project site.
SECTION 4.4.(c) Report. – On September 1 of each year that funds appropriated
for the project site under this section are expended or remain unexpended, the Department shall
report on the use of such funds to the House of Representatives and the Senate committee or
subcommittee responsible for base budget appropriations, to the Joint Legislative Economic
Development and Global Engagement Oversight Committee, to the Joint Legislative
House Bill 358 Session Law 2025-92 Page 17

Commission on Governmental Operations, and to the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall
include, at a minimum, an executive summary of the performance of the eligible business; the
performance criteria, remedies, and safeguards required by the Department for the funds; a
description of the current status of the project; the amount that was paid in the prior fiscal year;
the purpose for which the amount was paid; and the total amount that has been paid.
TRANSFORMATIVE PROJECT BASE PERIOD FLEXIBILITY
SECTION 4.5.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 143B-437.56, G.S. 143B-437.59, or any
other provision of law, a qualifying business may request the resetting of, and the Committee
may agree to reset, the base period applicable to the transformative project. For purposes of this
section, the definitions in G.S. 143B-437.51 apply, and a qualifying business is a business that
(i) has entered into an agreement for a transformative project, (ii) is not more than 48 months
into the base period, (iii) employs over 1,000 full-time employees in the State, and (iv) has not
received any grant payments.
SECTION 4.5.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and expires June
30, 2026.
JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY
SALE OF MAINFRAME AND RELATED TECHNOLOGY COMPONENTS
SECTION 5.1. Notwithstanding Article 3A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes,
G.S. 143-49(4), or any other law pertaining to surplus State property, the Administrative Office
of the Courts may sell its mainframe computing system and any related components on terms
that the Administrative Office of the Courts deems to be in its best interest without involvement
by the State Surplus Property Agency designated in G.S. 143-64.01 and without being required
to pay any service charge or surcharge to the State Surplus Property Agency. The net proceeds
of this sale shall be deposited in the Court Information Technology Fund established by
G.S. 7A-343.2.
REMOTE PUBLIC ACCESS FEES
SECTION 5.2. G.S. 7A-109(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) In order to facilitate public access to the electronic data processing records or any
compilation of electronic court records or data of the clerks of superior court, except where public
access is prohibited by law, the Director may enter into one or more nonexclusive contracts under
reasonable cost recovery terms with third parties to provide remote electronic access to the
electronic data processing records or any compilation of electronic court records or data of the
clerks of superior court by the public. Neither the Director nor the Administrative Office of the
Courts is the custodian of the records of the clerks of superior court or of the electronic data
processing records or any compilation of electronic court records or data of the clerks of superior
court. Costs Funds recovered pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer
to be held in the Court Information Technology Fund established in G.S. 7A-343.2."
PART VI. GENERAL GOVERNMENT
ALBEMARLE BUILDING OFFICE SPACE FOR OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR
SECTION 6.1.(a) No later than December 1, 2025, the Department of
Administration, in consultation with the Office of the State Auditor, shall assign office space
within the Albemarle Building in Raleigh, North Carolina, to the Office of the State Auditor for
its exclusive use. The assigned space shall consist of two additional floors for a total of four
floors.
Page 18 Session Law 2025-92 House Bill 358

SECTION 6.1.(b) This section controls over any conflicting space assignment plan
or policy to the extent of the conflict.
SECTION 6.1.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law.
PART VII. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY [RESERVED]
PART VIII. CAPITAL
CAPITAL PROJECT FUNDING
SECTION 8.1. Section 5.1 of S.L. 2025-89 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 5.1.(a) There is appropriated from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund to
the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of eight hundred twenty-three million five
hundred sixty-five thousand eight hundred ninety-seven eight hundred eighty-eight million five
hundred sixty-five thousand eight hundred ninety-seven dollars ($823,565,897) ($888,565,897)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the following project codes
in the following amounts:
(1) DACS21-2 $1,500,000
(2) DACS21-4 1,500,000
(3) DEQ21-1 17,075,000
(4) DNCR21-13 86,800,000
(5) DNCR23-7 7,000,000
(6) DOA23-2 800,000
(7) NCGA21-3 65,250,000
(8) NCGA23-1 26,000,000
(9) UNC/BOG21-1 3,750,000
(10) DOI21-1 22,000,000
(11) DPS21-9 19,793,242
(12) DPS21-6 2,658,750
(13) DPS23-9 2,024,414
(14) DPS23-11 5,927,250
(15) NG23-1 6,000,000
(16) NG23-2 5,750,000
(17) NG23-3 2,250,000
(18) TRAN23-1 60,000,000125,000,000
(19) UNC/ASU21-1 12,500,000
(20) UNC/ASU22-1 12,300,000
(21) UNC/ECS21-4 9,172,727
(22) UNC/ECS23-1 17,172,727
(23) UNC/ECU21-1 60,000,000
(24) UNC/FSU21-2 6,573,912
(25) UNC/NCS20-1 22,224,823
(26) UNC/NCS23-1 27,000,000
(27) UNC/NCS23-2 24,000,000
(28) UNC/SSM23-2 3,000,000
(29) UNC/CH20-2 17,693,052
(30) UNC/PEM21-1 30,500,000
(31) UNC/SA23-1 22,950,000
(32) UNC/WSS21-1 22,400,000
(33) R&R21 100,000,000
(34) UNC/R&R21 100,000,000
…
House Bill 358 Session Law 2025-92 Page 19

"SECTION 5.1.(e) There is appropriated from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund to
the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the University of North
Carolina at Pembroke for the Regional Emergency Response Center. This project shall be known
as project code UNC/PEM25-1 and shall have a maximum project authorization of five million
dollars ($5,000,000).
"SECTION 5.1.(f) There is appropriated from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund to
the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the State
Highway Patrol to be used for repair and renovation projects."
NCCU CHANCELLOR'S RESIDENCE
SECTION 8.2. Notwithstanding G.S. 146-30 or any other provision of law to the
contrary, the net proceeds from the sale of the Chancellor's residence at North Carolina Central
University (NCCU) shall be retained by NCCU and shall be deposited in a special fund to be
used solely for the purchase of another residence for the Chancellor, as approved by the Board
of Trustees of North Carolina Central University and consistent with applicable policies of the
Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina.
PART IX. TRANSPORTATION
RALEIGH-DURHAM AIRPORT AUTHORITY FUNDS
SECTION 9.1. There is appropriated from the Stabilization and Inflation Reserve
established in Section 2.2(q) of S.L. 2022-74 to the Department of Transportation, Division of
Aviation, the sum of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) in nonrecurring funds for
each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to support the efforts of the Raleigh-Durham Airport
Authority (Authority) to expand international nonstop service to Dublin, Ireland, at
Raleigh-Durham International Airport (RDU). The airline providing this nonstop service from
RDU to Dublin will maintain an agreed upon seasonal schedule during the two-year period of
performance. Disbursements of funds will be payable in two equal disbursements (i) following
completion of 180 qualifying flights for the period of performance and (ii) following completion
of the 360 qualifying flights. A qualifying flight is an outbound direct flight from RDU to Dublin
Airport in Ireland (DUB) on a branded mainline product beginning on or about April 13, 2026.
The airline shall, on average, operate at least 14 monthly qualifying flights during the two-year
period of performance. Funds appropriated pursuant to this section do not revert and will remain
available to the Division for such purposes.
AVAILABILITY OF BRUNSWICK COUNTY AIRPORT GRANT FUNDS
SECTION 9.2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds provided
as a grant to the Brunswick County Airport in Item 39, page J 31 of the Committee Report
referenced in Section 43.2 of S.L. 2023-134 that remain unexpended and unencumbered shall not
revert and shall remain available for expenditure on new airport improvement projects.
TRI-COUNTY AIRPORT
SECTION 9.3. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund, Budget Code 84210,
to the Department of Transportation, Division of Aviation, the sum of three million six hundred
thousand dollars ($3,600,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used for
costs associated with hangar improvements at the Tri-County Airport. Funds appropriated
pursuant to this section shall not revert but shall remain available until completion of the
improvements.
Page 20 Session Law 2025-92 House Bill 358

COASTAL CAROLINA REGIONAL AIRPORT AUTHORITY FUNDING
SECTION 9.4. Provided the Coastal Carolina Regional Airport Authority
(Authority) enters into a long-term lease agreement to rent space to a tenant at Coastal Carolina
Regional Airport (Airport), there is appropriated from the Stabilization and Inflation Reserve
established in Section 2.2(q) of S.L. 2022-74 to the Department of Transportation, Division of
Aviation, the sum of ten million four hundred thousand dollars ($10,400,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, to be allocated to the Authority for site improvement and
infrastructure needs at the Airport necessary to accommodate the tenant subject to the lease
required by this section. Funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall not revert but shall
remain available until completion of the improvements or infrastructure projects.
PART X. MISCELLANEOUS AND EFFECTIVE DATE
EFFECT OF HEADINGS
SECTION 10.1. The headings to the Parts and sections of this act are a convenience
to the reader and are for reference only. The headings do not expand, limit, or define the text of
this act.
CONSTRUCTION
SECTION 10.2. Except where expressly repealed or amended by this act, any
legislation enacted during the 2025 Regular Session expressly appropriating funds to an agency,
a department, or an institution covered under this act shall remain in effect.
STATE BUDGET ACT APPLICABILITY
SECTION 10.3. If any provision of this act and G.S. 143C-5-4 are in conflict, the
provisions of this act shall prevail. The appropriations and the authorizations to allocate and
spend funds which are set out in this act shall remain in effect until the Current Operations
Appropriations Act for the applicable fiscal year becomes law, at which time that act shall
become effective and shall govern appropriations and expenditures. When the Current
Operations Appropriations Act for that fiscal year becomes law, the Director of the Budget shall
adjust allotments to give effect to that act from July 1 of the fiscal year.
SEVERABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 10.4. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
House Bill 358 Session Law 2025-92 Page 21

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 10.5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective retroactively to
July 1, 2025.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 23rd day of September,
2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 11:08 a.m. this 30th day of September, 2025
Page 22 Session Law 2025-92 House Bill 358